Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 7. Vessel Permit System for Bering Sea Hair Crab Fishery.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings applicable to the development of a vessel-based permit system under this article, see § 1, ch. 137, SLA 2002, in the 2002 Temporary and Special Acts.

For vessel permit systems for weathervane scallop fisheries, see former AS

16.43.906

and 16.43.911 and former AS

16.43.450

,

16.43.460

,

16.43.470

,

16.43.480

,

16.43.490

,

16.43.500

,

16.43.510

, and

16.43.520

.

Sec. 16.43.450.
Vessel permit system. [Repealed, § 27 ch 137 SLA 2002.]

Sec. 16.43.451.
Bering Sea hair crab fishery vessel permit system.

History.

[Repealed, § 20 ch 2 SLA 2014.]

Sec. 16.43.460.
Initial issuance of vessel permits. [Repealed, § 27 ch 137 SLA 2002.]

Sec. 16.43.461.
Initial issuance of vessel permits.

History.

[Repealed, § 20 ch 2 SLA 2014.]

Sec. 16.43.470.
Optimum number range of vessel permits. [Repealed, § 27 ch 137 SLA 2002.]

Sec. 16.43.471.
Optimum number range of vessel permits.

History.

[Repealed, § 20 ch 2 SLA 2014.]

Sec. 16.43.480.
Transfer and expiration of vessel entry permits. [Repealed, § 27 ch 137 SLA 2002.]

Sec. 16.43.481.
Transfer and expiration of vessel entry permits.

History.

[Repealed, § 20 ch 2 SLA 2014.]

Sec. 16.43.490.
Substitution of vessels. [Repealed, § 27 ch 137 SLA 2002.]

Sec. 16.43.491.
Substitution of vessels.

History.

[Repealed, § 20 ch 2 SLA 2014.]

Sec. 16.43.500.
Renewal of vessel permits. [Repealed, § 27 ch 137 SLA 2002.]

Sec. 16.43.501.
Renewal of vessel permits.

History.

[Repealed, § 20 ch 2 SLA 2014.]

Sec. 16.43.510.
Vessel permit fees. [Repealed, § 27 ch 137 SLA 2002.]

Sec. 16.43.511.
Vessel permit fees.

History.

[Repealed, § 20 ch 2 SLA 2014.]

Sec. 16.43.520.
General vessel permit provisions. [Repealed, § 27 ch 137 SLA 2002.]

Sec. 16.43.521.
General Bering Sea hair crab vessel permit provisions.

History.

[Repealed, § 20 ch 2 SLA 2014.]